Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Diagnostic Pharmaceutical Agents

§ 1723.
Repealed. 2009, No. 103 (Adj. Sess.), § 53.

§ 1724.
Repealed.
2005, No. 71, § 72a, eff. July 1, 2006.

§ 1724a.
Repealed. 2009, No. 103 (Adj. Sess.), § 53.

§ 1725.
Repealed. 2009, No. 35, § 41(a).

§ 1726.
Repealed. 1993, No. 216 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1727.
Expiration date.

An optometrist shall state the expiration date on the face of every prescription written by that optometrist for contact lenses. The expiration date shall be one year after the examination date unless a medical or refractive problem affecting vision requires an earlier expiration date.

An optometrist shall not refuse to give the buyer a copy of the buyer’s prescription after the expiration date; however, the copy shall be clearly marked to indicate that it is an expired prescription.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2019, No. 30

, § 12.